District of Columbia statutes.
22-3226.09

Civil penalties.

(a)

The following penalties may be imposed in addition to those otherwise available at law:

(1)

Any telephone solicitor who violates any provision of this subchapter may be fined up to $1,000 per violation.

(2)

A permit or license shall be revoked or suspended if the seller or telephone solicitor fails to comply with the registration requirements of this subchapter.

(3)

A judge may impose treble damages against any telephone solicitor who knowingly targets elderly persons or persons with disabilities.

(b)

Fines shall be payable to the Fraud Prevention Fund established in § 22-3226.14.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 126i
as added June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 102, 47 DCR 7039
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 36, 53 DCR 6198
This section is referenced in § 22-3226.06 and § 22-3226.15.
D.C. Law 16-305, in subsec. (a)(3), substituted “persons or persons with disabilities” for “or disabled persons”.